hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Vontatott vízi sportok: Ballasztzsákok és pumpák; Térddeszkázás; Vontatható raftok és csövek; Vontatottvízisport-kesztyűk; Wakeboardozás; Wakesurf; Vízisíelés; Vízisport-vontatókábelek
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Sports nautiques tractés: Sacs de ballast et pompes; Kneeboard; Bouées et radeaux tractables; Gants de sports nautiques tractés; Wakeboard; Wakesurf; Ski nautique; Câbles de traction pour sports nautiques
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Deportes acuáticos remolcados: Bolsas y bombas de lastre; Surf de rodillas; Lanchas hinchables y botes remolcables; Guantes para deportes acuáticos de arrastre; Tablaestela; Wakesurf; Esquí acuático; Cables de remolque
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Watersporten met motorische aandrijving: Ballastzakken en pompen; Kneeboarden; Funtubes; Handschoenen voor watersporten met motorische aandrijving; Wakeboarden; Wakesurfen; Waterskiën; Sleeplijnen voor watersport
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 견인식 수상 스포츠: 밸러스트 백 및 펌프; 니보딩; 견인식 래프트/튜브; 견인식 수상 스포츠 장갑; 웨이크보딩; 웨이크서핑; 수상스키; 수상 스포츠 견인 케이블
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Towed Water Sports: Ballast Bags & Pumps; Kneeboarding; Towable Rafts & Tubes; Towed Water Sport Gloves; Wakeboarding; Wakesurfing; Water Skiing; Water Sport Tow Cables
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Sporty wodne holowane: Torby i pompki balastowe; Kneeboarding; Tratwy i rury do holowania; Rękawiczki do sportów wodnych holowanych; Wakeboarding; Wakesurfing; Jazda na nartach wodnych; Liny do holowania łodzi
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Sport nautici con traino: Sacche di zavorra e pompe; Kneeboard; Zattere e tubi gonfiabili trainabili; Guanti per sport acquatici con traino; Wakeboard; Wakesurf; Sci nautico; Corde da traino per sport acquatici
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Vlečné vodní sporty: Zátěžové vaky a pumpy; Jízda na klekacích prknech; Vodní tahací hračky; Rukavice na vlečné vodní sporty; Jízda na vodních prknech; Wakesurfing; Vodní lyžování; Vlečná lana pro vodní sporty
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > トーイングアクティビティ: バラストバッグ・ポンプ; ニーボード用品; トーイングチューブ; トーイング用グローブ; ウェイクボード用品; ウェイクサーフィン; 水上スキー用品; トーイングロープ
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > กีฬาทางน้ำแบบลาก: ถุงและที่สูบลมถ่วงน้ำหนัก; การเล่นบอร์ดนั่ง; โซฟาและบานาน่าโบ๊ท; ถุงมือกีฬาลากจูงทางน้ำ; การเล่นเวคบอร์ด; เวคเซิร์ฟ; กีฬาสกีน้ำ; สายลากสำหรับกีฬาทางน้ำ
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 滑水用品: 压载水袋与水泵; 跪板滑水; 充气牵引筏/拖拉船; 滑水/拖拽式水上运动手套; 尾波滑水; 尾波冲浪; 滑水; 水上运动牵引缆绳
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Vandsport, hvor man trækkes: Ballastposer og pumper; Kneeboarding; Rafter og slanger, der kan trækkes; Handsker til vandski og lignende; Wakeboarding; Wakesurfing; Vandskiløb; Trækkabler til vandsport
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Водни спортове с теглене: Баластни торби и помпи; Нийборд; Надуваеми салове и тръби за теглене; Ръкавици за водни спортове с теглене; Уейкборд; Уейксърфинг; Каране на водни ски; Въжета за теглене за водни спортове
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Θαλάσσια σπορ με ρυμούλκηση: Σάκοι και τρόμπες έρματος; Kneeboarding; Ρυμουλκούμενες σχεδίες & σωλήνες; Γάντια ρυμουλκούμενων σπορ; Σέρφινγκ με ρυμουλκούμενο; Wakesurfing; Σκι νερού; Καλώδια έλξης για θαλάσσια σπορ
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Desportos aquáticos de reboque: Sacos e bombas de lastro; Kneeboard; Tubos e jangadas para reboque; Luvas para desportos aquáticos de reboque; Wakeboard; Wakesurf; Esqui aquático; Cabos para desportos aquáticos de reboque
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Esportes aquáticos rebocados: Sacos e bombas de lastro; Kneeboarding; Botes rebocáveis; Luvas para esportes aquáticos rebocados; Wakeboard; Wakesurfing; Esqui aquático; Cabos para reboque em esportes aquáticos
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Vattensporter med draglina: Ballastsäckar och pumpar; Kneeboarding; Flottar och slangar med draglina; Handskar för vattensport med båtdragning; Wakeboarding; Wakesurfing; Vattenskidåkning; Draglinor för vattensporter
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Trukket vannsport: Ballastposer og pumper; Kneboarding; Trekkbare flåter og tuber; Hansker for trukket vannsport; Wakeboarding; Wakesurfing; Vannskisport; Trekkabler for vannsport
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Vesiurheilulajit veneen perässä: Painolastipussit ja pumput; Kneeboarding; Vedettävät patjat ja renkaat; Vesiurheilu veneen perässä; Wakeboarding; Wakesurffaus; Vesihiihto; Vesiurheilulajien vetoköydet
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 纜繩滑水: 壓艙袋與幫浦; 跪式滑水; 可拖行船艇; 水上運動手套; 寬板滑水; 快艇衝浪; 滑水; 滑水繩
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Vlečné vodné športy: Záťažové vaky a čerpadlá; Kneeboarding; Vlečné rafty a nafukovacie kolesá; Rukavice na vlečné vodné športy; Wakeboarding; Wakesurfing; Vodné lyžovanie; Vlečné laná pre vodné športy
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Катание по воде за катером: Балластные мешки и насосы; Нибординг; Прицепные плоты и водные ватрушки; Перчатки для катания по воде за катером; Вейкбординг; Вейксерфинг; Катание на водных лыжах; Тросы для катания по воде за катером
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Vučni vodeni sportovi: Vreće s balastom i pumpe; Kneeboard; Vučne splavi i jastuci; Rukavice za vučne vodene sportove; Wakeboard; Wakesurfing; Skijanje na vodi; Kabel za vuču za vodene sportove
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Çekmeli Su Sporları: Balast çantaları ve pompaları; Kneeboard Sporu; Çekilebilir Sallar ve Tüpler; Su Kayağı Eldivenleri; Wakeboard Sporu; Wakesurf; Su Kayağı Sporu; Su Sporu Çekme Kabloları
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Vlečni športi na vodi: Vreče za obtežitev in črpalke; Kneeboarding; Vlečni splavi in obroči; Rokavice za vlečne športe na vodi; Deskanje na vodi; Wakesurfanje; Smučanje na vodi; Vlečne vrvi za vodne športe
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Velkamasis vandens sportas: Balasto maišai ir siurbliai; Klūpimųjų banglenčių sportas; Velkamieji plaustai ir vamzdžiai; Velkamojo vandens sporto pirštinės; Vandenlenčių sportas; Wakesurfing sportas; Vandens slidžių sportas; Vandens sporto vilkimo trosai
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván có thuyền kéo: Túi đối trọng và bơm; Lướt ván quỳ; Phao chuối và bè kéo; Găng tay kéo ván nước; Lướt ván sóng; Lướt sóng sau tàu; Lướt ván nước; Cáp kéo thể thao dưới nước
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Sporturi nautice cu remorcare: Saci de balast și pompe; Kneeboarding; Plute și tuburi remorcabile; Mănuși pentru sporturi nautice cu remorcare; Wakeboarding; Wakesurfing; Schi nautic; Cabluri de remorcare pentru sporturi nautice
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Seilgebundene Wassersportarten: Ballastsäcke & Pumpen; Kneeboarding; Tubes & Towables; Handschuhe für seilgebundene Wassersportarten; Wakeboarding; Wakesurfing; Wasserski; Zugseile für Wassersport